Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.230

License required for branch office.

If a licensee maintains a branch office, the licensee shall not operate that branch office until a branch office license has been received from the director. A bail bond agency may apply to the director for authority to establish one or more branch offices under the same name as the main office upon the payment of a fee as prescribed by the director by rule. The director shall issue a separate license for each branch office showing the location of each branch which shall be prominently displayed in the office for which it is issued. A corporation, partnership, or sole proprietorship shall not establish more than one principal office within this state.

[ 1996 c 242 s 4.]